New York, session 2025-2026, A4800.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Tuition-Free 2 NY". 3 § 2. Paragraph h of subdivision 2 of section 355 of the education law 4 is amended by adding a new subparagraph 1-a to read as follows: 5 (1-a) The trustees shall implement a program to permit any student who 6 has been admitted to a state-operated institution of the state universi- 7 ty to attend without the payment of tuition and fees if such student 8 fulfills the requirements of such program pursuant to the provisions of 9 this subparagraph. The provisions of this subparagraph shall only apply 10 to costs of one undergraduate degree and any additional costs associated 11 with more than one simultaneous undergraduate degree shall not be 12 covered by this program. 13 (i) The trustees shall provide an application process and administer 14 the program according to the following criteria: 15 (A) Any student eligible for resident tuition rates is eligible for 16 this program. 17 (B) A student shall be required to sign a contract agreeing to reside 18 in New York state for a period of five years subsequent to completion of 19 their academic program. 20 (C) Students shall be required to complete their degree program within 21 a minimum period of time to be set by the trustees which shall be no 22 less than three years and no more than five years. 23 (D) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this subpara- 24 graph shall be allowed to attend an out-of-state graduate school without 25 any penalty if such student pursues a graduate degree. Once such student EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08253-01-5 A. 4800 2 1 concludes their graduate school studies, such student shall return to 2 New York within one year for residency, per the program's requirements, 3 or else the undergraduate benefit will turn into a student loan pursuant 4 to the provisions of clause (ii) of this subparagraph. 5 (E) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this subpara- 6 graph who is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States 7 shall not be penalized if such student maintains their legal residence 8 in the state of New York, during such service. "Legal residence" as used 9 in this subclause shall mean the place where a member of the military 10 intends to return and live after discharge or retirement, and which they 11 consider their permanent home. Legal residency shall be determined by 12 what local and state tax laws a member of the military is subject to, 13 and in which state they may vote. 14 (ii) If a student or former student fails to fulfill any of the 15 requirements set forth in clause (i) of this subparagraph, the trustees 16 shall convert to a student loan the full amount of the tuition which 17 would have been paid by such student, as determined by the New York 18 state higher education services corporation, plus interest, according to 19 a schedule to be determined by such corporation. Such repayment may 20 also be required if a recipient fails to respond to requests for infor- 21 mation necessary to determine continued eligibility or for adminis- 22 tration of the program. The terms and conditions of this clause shall 23 be deferred for students who enroll on at least a half-time basis in an 24 approved undergraduate, graduate or higher degree program or other 25 professional licensure degree program until they are conferred a degree, 26 and shall also be deferred for any interruption in undergraduate study 27 as established by the rules and regulations of the corporation. The 28 terms and conditions of this clause may also be deferred for a grace 29 period, to be established by the corporation, following the completion 30 of an approved undergraduate program or a graduate or higher degree 31 program or other professional licensure degree program. Notwithstanding 32 any provisions of this clause to the contrary, the corporation is 33 authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the waiver 34 or suspension of any financial obligation which would involve extreme 35 hardship. 36 (iii) Any student who elects to participate in the program under this 37 subparagraph shall be required to apply for tuition assistance program 38 funding. Funds awarded on the tuition assistance program shall be 39 applied towards the cost of tuition prior to an award under this subpar- 40 agraph. 41 (iv) Students shall be responsible for all other costs including hous- 42 ing, fees and other non-tuition related charges. 43 (v) (A) This program shall not apply in academic years commencing on 44 or before the effective date of this subparagraph. (B) For the first two 45 years after the effective date of this subparagraph, this program shall 46 only apply to students attending community colleges as defined by subdi- 47 vision two of section sixty-three hundred one of this chapter. (C) In 48 all other years, this program shall apply to all students attending 49 SUNY, CUNY, and community colleges of the state. 50 § 3. Subdivision 7 of section 6206 of the education law is amended by 51 adding a new paragraph (g) to read as follows: 52 (g) The trustees shall implement a program to permit any student who 53 has been admitted to an institution operated by the city university to 54 attend without the payment of tuition and fees if such student fulfills 55 the requirements of such program pursuant to the provisions of this 56 paragraph. A. 4800 3 1 (i) The trustees shall provide an application process and administer 2 the program according to the following criteria: 3 (A) Any student eligible for resident tuition rates is eligible for 4 this program. 5 (B) A student shall be required to sign a contract agreeing to reside 6 in New York state for a period of five years subsequent to completion of 7 their academic program. 8 (C) Students shall be required to complete their degree program within 9 a minimum period of time to be set by the trustees which shall be no 10 less than three years and no more than five years. 11 (D) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this para- 12 graph shall be allowed to attend an out-of-state graduate school without 13 any penalty if such student pursues a graduate degree. Once such student 14 concludes their graduate school studies, such student shall return to 15 New York within one year for residency per the program's requirements, 16 or else the undergraduate benefit will turn into a student loan pursuant 17 to the provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph. 18 (E) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this para- 19 graph who is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States 20 shall not be penalized if such student maintains their legal residence 21 in the state of New York, during such service. "Legal residence" as used 22 in this clause shall mean the place where a member of the military 23 intends to return and live after discharge or retirement, and which they 24 consider their permanent home. Legal residency shall be determined by 25 what local and state tax laws a member of the military is subject to, 26 and in which state they may vote. 27 (ii) If a student or former student fails to fulfill any of the 28 requirements set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the trus- 29 tees shall convert to a student loan the full amount of the tuition 30 which would have been paid by such student, as determined by the New 31 York state higher education services corporation, plus interest, accord- 32 ing to a schedule to be determined by such corporation. Such repayment 33 may also be required if a recipient fails to respond to requests for 34 information necessary to determine continued eligibility or for adminis- 35 tration of the program. The terms and conditions of this clause shall 36 be deferred for students who enroll on at least a half-time basis in an 37 approved undergraduate, graduate or higher degree program or other 38 professional licensure degree program until they are conferred a degree, 39 and shall also be deferred for any interruption in undergraduate study 40 as established by the rules and regulations of the corporation. The 41 terms and conditions of this clause may also be deferred for a grace 42 period, to be established by the corporation, following the completion 43 of an approved undergraduate program or a graduate or higher degree 44 program or other professional licensure degree program. Notwithstanding 45 any provisions of this clause to the contrary, the corporation is 46 authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the waiver 47 or suspension of any financial obligation which would involve extreme 48 hardship. 49 (iii) Any student who elects to participate in the program under this 50 paragraph shall be required to apply for tuition assistance program 51 funding. Funds awarded on the tuition assistance program shall be 52 applied towards the cost of tuition prior to an award under this subpar- 53 agraph. 54 (iv) Students shall be responsible for all other costs including hous- 55 ing, fees and other non-tuition related charges. A. 4800 4 1 (v) The provisions of this subdivision shall not be subject to taxa- 2 tion. 3 (vi) (A) This program shall not apply in academic years commencing on 4 or before the effective date of this paragraph. (B) For the first two 5 years after the effective date of this paragraph, this program shall 6 only apply to students attending community colleges as defined by subdi- 7 vision two of section sixty-three hundred one of this title. (C) In all 8 other years, this program shall apply to all students attending SUNY, 9 CUNY and community colleges of the state. 10 § 4. Subdivision 1 of section 6304 of the education law is amended by 11 adding a new paragraph e to read as follows: 12 e. The trustees, sponsors or other governing body of a community 13 college shall implement a program to permit any student who has been 14 admitted to such community college to attend without the payment of 15 tuition and fees if such student fulfills the requirements of such 16 program pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph. 17 (i) The trustees shall provide an application process and administer 18 the program according to the following criteria: 19 (A) Any student eligible for resident tuition rates is eligible for 20 this program. 21 (B) A student shall be required to sign a contract agreeing to reside 22 in New York state for a period of five years subsequent to completion of 23 their academic program. 24 (C) Students shall be required to complete their degree program within 25 a minimum period of time to be set by the trustees which shall be no 26 less than one year and no more than three years. 27 (D) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this subpara- 28 graph shall be allowed to attend an out-of-state graduate school without 29 any penalty if such student pursues a graduate degree. Once such student 30 concludes their graduate school studies, such student shall return to 31 New York within one year for residency per the program's requirements, 32 or else the undergraduate benefit will turn into a student loan pursuant 33 to the provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph. 34 (E) A student who benefited from the program outlined in this para- 35 graph who is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States 36 shall not be penalized if such student maintains their legal residence 37 in the state of New York, during such service. "Legal residence" as used 38 in this clause shall mean the place where a member of the military 39 intends to return and live after discharge or retirement, and which they 40 consider their permanent home. Legal residency shall be determined by 41 what local and state tax laws a member of the military is subject to, 42 and in which state they may vote. 43 (ii) If a student or former student fails to fulfill any of the 44 requirements set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the trus- 45 tees shall convert to a student loan the full amount of the tuition 46 which would have been paid by such student, as determined by the New 47 York state higher education services corporation, plus interest, accord- 48 ing to a schedule to be determined by such corporation. Such repayment 49 may also be required if a recipient fails to respond to requests for 50 information necessary to determine continued eligibility or for adminis- 51 tration of the program. The terms and conditions of this subparagraph 52 shall be deferred for students who enroll on at least a half-time basis 53 in an approved undergraduate, graduate or higher degree program or other 54 professional licensure degree program until they are conferred a degree, 55 and shall also be deferred for any interruption in undergraduate study 56 as established by the rules and regulations of the corporation. The A. 4800 5 1 terms and conditions of this subparagraph may also be deferred for a 2 grace period, to be established by the corporation, following the 3 completion of an approved undergraduate program or a graduate or higher 4 degree program or other professional licensure degree program. Notwith- 5 standing any provisions of this subparagraph to the contrary, the corpo- 6 ration is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for 7 the waiver or suspension of any financial obligation which would involve 8 extreme hardship. 9 (iii) Any student who elects to participate in the program under this 10 paragraph shall be required to apply for tuition assistance program 11 funding. Funds awarded on the tuition assistance program shall be 12 applied towards the cost of tuition prior to an award under this subpar- 13 agraph. 14 (iv) Students shall be responsible for all other costs including hous- 15 ing, fees and other non-tuition related charges. 16 (v) (A) This program shall not apply in academic years commencing on 17 or before the effective date of this paragraph. (B) For the first two 18 years after the effective date of this paragraph, this program shall 19 only apply to students attending community colleges as defined by subdi- 20 vision two of section sixty-three hundred one of this article. (C) In 21 all other years, this program shall apply to all students attending 22 SUNY, CUNY and community colleges of the state. 23 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 6304 of the education law is amended by 24 adding a new paragraph a-1 to read as follows: 25 a-1. State financial aid shall be increased above the one-third amount 26 of operating costs set forth in paragraph a of this subdivision by an 27 amount which is equal to the cost of tuition awarded to students who 28 apply and qualify for the program set forth in paragraph e of this 29 subdivision. 30 § 6. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 31 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 32 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 33 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 34 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.